California statutes. Public Resources Code
(5) In case of late payment of the reporting fee, a penalty of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) or 10 percent of the amount due, whichever is greater, plus interest at the rate of 112 percent per month, computed from the delinquent date of the assessment until and including the date of
 payment, shall be assessed. New mining operations that have not submitted a report shall submit a report before commencement of operations. The new operation shall submit its fee according to the reasonable fee schedule adopted by the board, and the month that the report is received shall become that operation’s anniversary month.

(e) The lead agency, or the board when acting as the lead agency, may impose a fee on each mining operation to cover the reasonable costs incurred in implementing this chapter and the Surface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1975 (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 2710)).

(f) For purposes of this section, “mining operation” means a mining operation of any kind or character whatever in this state, including, but not limited to, a mining operation that is classified as a “surface mining operation” as defined in Section 2735, unless excepted by Section 2714,
 and the extraction of minerals from geothermal brine, or any other brine, including, but not limited to, a mining operation colocated or co-operated with geothermal resource facilities. For purposes of fee collections only, “mining operation” may include one or more mines operated by a single operator or mining company on one or more sites, if the total annual combined mineral production for all sites is less than 100 troy ounces for precious metals, if precious metals are the primary mineral commodity produced, or less than 100,000 short tons if the primary mineral commodity produced is not precious metals.

(g) Any information in reports submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) that includes or otherwise indicates the total mineral production, reserves, or rate of depletion of any mining operation may not be disclosed to any member of the public, as defined in Section 7920.515 of the Government Code. Other portions of the reports are public
 records unless excepted by statute. Statistical bulletins based on these reports and published under Section 2205 shall be compiled to show, for the state as a whole and separately for each lead agency, the total of each mineral produced therein. In order not to disclose the production, reserves, or rate of depletion from any identifiable mining operation, a production figure shall not be published or otherwise disclosed unless that figure is the aggregated production of not less than three mining operations. If the production figure for any lead agency would disclose the production, reserves, or rate of depletion of less than three mining operations or otherwise permit the reasonable inference of the production, reserves, or rate of depletion of any identifiable mining operation, that figure shall be combined with the same figure of not less than two other lead agencies without regard to the location of the lead agencies. The bulletin shall be published annually by June 30 or as soon thereafter as
 practicable.

(h) The approval of a form by the board pursuant to this section is not the adoption of a regulation for purposes of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and is not subject to that act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 131, Sec. 168.   (AB 1754)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2207.1.

A manufacturer or processor may report to the State Geologist data on consumption or utilization of mineral materials. Those reports, if appropriately identified as confidential by the submitting entity, shall be maintained by the department as confidential. Publications issued as commodity or marketing studies
 pursuant to Section 2205 may contain figures from those reports, provided that these figures are presented so as not to disclose the consumption or utilization of minerals by any user.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 6.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2208.

The department may at any time enter or examine any and all mines, quarries, wells, mills, reduction works, refining works, and other mineral properties or working plants in this state in order to gather data to comply with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 7.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2213.

(a) The survey shall establish a Geologic Carbon Sequestration Group to provide independent expertise and regulatory guidance to the State Air Resources Board. The duties of the Geologic Carbon Sequestration Group shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Identification of high quality, suitable locations of Class VI injection wells, as defined in Section 144.6 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(2) Identification of appropriate subsurface monitoring to ensure geologic sequestration of the injected carbon dioxide.

(3) Identification of hazards that may require the suspension of carbon
 dioxide injections.

(b) For purposes of this section, “high quality, suitable locations” means reservoirs that have been modeled to be capable of maintaining integrity for at least 1,000 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 359, Sec. 3.   (SB 905)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Earthquake Fault Zoning [2621. - 2630.]

2621.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Alquist-Priolo Earthquake Fault Zoning Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 197, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.5.

(a) It is the purpose of this chapter to provide for the adoption and administration of zoning laws, ordinances, rules, and regulations by cities and counties in implementation of the general plan that is in effect in any city or county. The Legislature declares that this chapter is intended to provide policies and criteria to assist cities, counties, and state agencies in the exercise of their responsibility to prohibit the location of developments and structures for human occupancy across the trace of active faults. Further, it is the intent of this chapter to provide the citizens of the state with increased safety and to minimize the loss of life during and immediately following earthquakes by facilitating seismic retrofitting to strengthen buildings, including historical buildings, against ground shaking.

(b) This chapter is applicable to any project, as defined in Section 2621.6, which is located within a delineated earthquake fault zone, upon issuance of the official earthquake fault zones maps to affected local jurisdictions, except as provided in Section 2621.7.

(c) The implementation of this chapter shall be pursuant to policies and criteria established and adopted by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 916, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.6.

(a) As used in this chapter, “project” means either of the following:

(1) Any subdivision of land that is subject to the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code), and that contemplates the eventual construction of structures for human occupancy.

(2) Structures for human occupancy, with the exception of either of the following:

(A) Single-family wood-frame or steel-frame dwellings to be built on parcels of land for which geologic reports have been approved pursuant to
 paragraph (1).

(B) A single-family wood-frame or steel-frame dwelling not exceeding two stories when that dwelling is not part of a development of four or more dwellings.

(b) For the purposes of this chapter, a mobilehome whose body width exceeds eight feet shall be considered to be a single-family wood-frame dwelling not exceeding two stories.

(c) Terms used in this chapter that are not defined by this chapter shall have the same meaning as defined in the California Building Standards Code (Part 2 (commencing with Section 1.1.1) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 825, Sec. 1.   (AB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.7.

This chapter, except Section 2621.9, shall not apply to any of the following:

(a) The conversion of an existing apartment complex into a condominium.

(b) An alteration to any structure for human occupancy if the value of the alteration does not exceed 50 percent of the appraised value of the structure and, if the alteration results in a change in the use or occupancy of the structure, the change does not authorize a greater human occupant load and is less hazardous, based on life and fire risk, than the existing authorized use or occupancy of the structure permitted by the city or county with jurisdiction over the structure.

(c) (1) Any structure located within the jurisdiction of the City of Berkeley or the City of Oakland that was damaged by fire between October 20, 1991, and October 23, 1991, if granted an exemption pursuant to this subdivision.

(2) The city may apply to the State Geologist for an exemption and the State Geologist shall grant the exemption only if the structure located within the earthquake fault zone is not situated upon a trace of an active fault line, as delineated in the official earthquake fault zone map or in more recent geologic data, as determined by the State Geologist.

(3) When requesting an exemption,
 the city shall submit to the State Geologist all of the following information:

(A) Maps noting the parcel numbers of proposed building sites that are at least 50 feet from an identified fault and a statement that there is not any more recent information to indicate a geologic hazard.

(B) Identification of any sites that are within 50 feet of an identified fault.

(C) Proof that the property owner has been notified that the granting of an exemption is not any guarantee that a geologic hazard does not exist.

(4) The granting of the exemption does not relieve a seller of real property or an agent for the seller of the obligation to disclose to a
 prospective purchaser that the property is located within a delineated earthquake fault zone, as required by Section 2621.9.

(d) (1) Alterations that include seismic retrofitting, as defined in Section 8894.2 of the Government Code, to any of the following listed types of structures for human occupancy:

(A) Buildings, as described in subdivision (a) of Section 8875 of the Government Code, with unreinforced masonry unit (URM) or lateral force resisting systems, or buildings with URM infill walls that
 interact with the lateral force resisting system.

(B) Buildings with flexible diaphragms and deficient out-of-plane anchorage to concrete or masonry bearing or nonbearing walls permitted under the 1994 or earlier editions of the Uniform Building Code.

(C) Reinforced nonductile concrete buildings permitted under the 1991 or earlier editions of the Uniform Building Code.

(D) Wood-framed buildings with soft, weak, or open-front wall lines on the ground floor permitted under the 1994 or earlier editions of the Uniform Building Code.

(E) Buildings with precast concrete members attached with nonductile connections permitted under the 1994 or earlier
 editions of the Uniform Building Code.

(F) Steel-frame buildings with welded moment frame connections permitted
 under the 1994 or earlier editions of the Uniform Building Code.

(G) Steel-braced frame buildings permitted under the 1994 or earlier editions of the Uniform Building Code.

(H) Wood-framed buildings on or into a slope greater than one unit vertical and three units horizontal (33.3 percent) permitted under the 1994 or earlier editions of the Uniform Building Code.

(2) The exemption granted by paragraph (1) shall not apply unless a city or county acts in accordance with all of the following:

(A) The building permit issued by the city or county for the alterations authorizes no greater human occupant load, regardless of proposed use or
 occupancy, than that authorized for the existing use or occupancy permitted at the time the city or county grants the exemption. This may be accomplished by the city or county making a human occupant load determination that is based on, and no greater than, the existing authorized use or occupancy, and including that determination on the building permit application as well as a statement substantially as follows: “Under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 2621.7 of the Public Resources Code, the occupant load is limited to the occupant load for the last lawful use or occupancy authorized or existing before the issuance of this building permit, as determined by the city or county.”

(B) The city or county requires seismic retrofitting, as defined in Section 8894.2 of the Government Code, that is necessary to strengthen the entire structure for human occupancy and provide increased resistance to ground shaking from earthquakes.

(C) Exemptions granted pursuant to paragraph (1) are reported in writing to the State Geologist within 30 days of the building permit issuance date.

(3) Any structure for human occupancy with restrictions under subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall not be granted a new building permit that allows an increase in human occupant loads unless a geologic report, prepared pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 3603 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations in effect on
 January 1, 1994, demonstrates that the structure is not on the trace of an active fault, or the requirement of a geologic report has been waived pursuant to Section 2623.

(4) A qualified historical building within an earthquake fault zone that is exempt pursuant to this subdivision may be repaired or seismically retrofitted using the State Historical Building Code, except that, notwithstanding any provision of that building code and its implementing regulations, paragraph (2) shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 825, Sec. 2.   (AB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.8.

Notwithstanding Section 818.2 of the Government Code, a city or county which knowingly issues a permit that grants an exemption pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 2621.7 that does not adhere to the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 2621.7, may be liable for earthquake-related injuries or deaths caused by its failure to so adhere.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 825, Sec. 3.   (AB 1046)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

2621.9.

(a) A person who is acting as an agent for a transferor of real property that is located within a delineated earthquake fault zone, or the transferor, if he or she is acting without an agent, shall disclose to any prospective transferee the fact that the property is located within a delineated earthquake fault zone.

(b) Disclosure is required pursuant to this section only when one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The transferor, or the transferor’s agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a delineated earthquake fault zone.

(2) A map that includes the property has been provided to the city or county pursuant to Section 2622, and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map and any information regarding changes to the map received by the county.

(c) In all transactions that are subject to Section 1103 of the Civil Code, the disclosure required by subdivision (a) of this section shall be provided by either of the following means:

(1) The Local Option Real Estate Transfer Disclosure Statement as provided in Section 1102.6a of the Civil Code.

(2) The Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement as provided in Section 1103.2 of the Civil Code.

(d) If the map or accompanying information is not of sufficient accuracy or scale that a reasonable person can determine if the subject real property is included in a delineated earthquake fault hazard zone, the agent shall mark “Yes” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement. The agent may mark “No” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement if he or she attaches a report prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1103.4 of the Civil Code that verifies the property is not in the hazard zone. Nothing in this subdivision is intended to limit or abridge any existing duty of the transferor or the transferor’s agents to exercise reasonable care in making a determination under this subdivision.

(e) For purposes of the disclosures required by this section, the following persons shall not be deemed agents of the transferor:

(1) Persons specified in Section 1103.11 of the Civil Code.

(2) Persons acting under a power of sale regulated by Section 2924 of the Civil Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, Section 1103.13 of the Civil Code shall apply.

(g) The specification of items for disclosure in this section does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other provision of law or that may exist in order to avoid fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the transfer transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 876, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

2622.

(a) In order to assist cities and counties in their planning, zoning, and building-regulation functions, the State Geologist shall delineate appropriately wide earthquake fault zones to encompass all potentially and recently active traces of the San Andreas, Calaveras, Hayward, and San Jacinto Faults, and such other faults, or segments thereof, as the State Geologist determines to be sufficiently active and well-defined as to constitute a potential hazard to structures from surface faulting or fault creep. The earthquake fault zones shall ordinarily be one-quarter mile
 or less in width, except in circumstances which may require the State Geologist to designate a wider zone.

(b) Pursuant to this section, the State Geologist shall compile maps delineating the earthquake fault zones and shall submit those maps to all affected cities, counties, and state agencies for review and comment. Concerned jurisdictions and agencies shall submit all comments to the board for review and consideration within 90 days. Within 90 days
 after the comment period concludes,
 the State Geologist shall provide copies of the official maps to concerned state agencies and to each city or county having jurisdiction over lands lying within that zone.

(c) The State Geologist shall continually review new geologic and seismic data and shall revise the earthquake fault zones or delineate additional earthquake fault zones when warranted by new information. The State Geologist shall submit all revised maps and additional maps to all affected cities, counties, and state agencies for their review and comment. Concerned jurisdictions and agencies shall submit all comments to the board for review and consideration within 90 days. Within 90 days
 after the comment period concludes, the State Geologist shall provide copies of the revised and additional official maps to concerned state agencies and to each city or county having jurisdiction over lands lying within the earthquake fault zone.

(d) In order to ensure that sellers of real property and their agents are adequately informed, any county that receives an official map pursuant to this section shall post a notice within five days of receipt of the map at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning commission, identifying the location of the map and the effective date of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 11.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2623.

(a) The approval of a project by a city or county shall be in accordance with policies and criteria established by the State Mining and Geology Board and the findings of the State Geologist. In the development of those policies and criteria, the State Mining and Geology Board shall seek the comment and advice of affected cities, counties, and state agencies. Cities and counties shall require, prior to the approval of a project, a geologic report defining and delineating any hazard of surface fault rupture. If the city or county finds that no undue hazard of that kind exists, the geologic report on the hazard may be waived, with the approval of the State Geologist.

(b) After a report has been approved or a waiver granted, subsequent geologic reports shall not be required, provided that new geologic data warranting further investigations is not recorded.

(c) The preparation of geologic reports that are required pursuant to this section for multiple projects may be undertaken by a geologic hazard abatement district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 916, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2624.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, cities and counties may do any of the following:

(1) Establish policies and criteria which are stricter than those established by this chapter.

(2) Impose and collect fees in addition to those required under this chapter.

(3) Determine not to grant exemptions authorized under this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 916, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

2625.

(a) Each applicant for approval of a project may be charged a reasonable fee by the city or county having jurisdiction over the project.

(b) Such fees shall be set in an amount sufficient to meet, but not to exceed, the costs to the city or county of administering and complying with the provisions of this chapter.

(c) The geologic report required by Section 2623 shall be in sufficient detail to meet the criteria and policies established by the State Mining and Geology Board for individual parcels of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 61.)
-------------------------------------------

2630.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the State Geologist and the board shall be advised by the Seismic Safety Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1243.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.6. State Mining and Minerals Policy [2650. - 2650.]

2650.

(a) It is the continuing policy of the State of California, in the interest of the needs of society for the wise use of mineral resources and for other sound conservation practices, to foster and encourage private enterprise in all of the following activities:

(1) The development within the state of economically sound and beneficial mineral industries and metal and mineral product reclamation industries.

(2) The orderly and economic exploration, development, and utilization of the state’s mineral resources and reclamation of metal and mineral products.

(3) Mining, mineral, and metallurgical research to promote the wise and efficient use of natural and reclaimable mineral resources.

(4) The study and development of methods for the control, disposal, reclamation, and utilization of mining and mineral processing waste products and the reclamation of mined lands so as to minimize any adverse effects of mineral extraction and processing upon the physical environment.

(b) The director shall carry out the policy set forth in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 999, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.8. Seismic Hazards Mapping [2690. - 2699.6.]

2690.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Seismic Hazards Mapping Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1168, Sec. 3.   Section operative April 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 2599.6 (later renumbered as 2699.6).)
-------------------------------------------

2691.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The effects of strong ground shaking, liquefaction, landslides, or other ground failure account for approximately 95 percent of economic losses caused by an earthquake. 

(b) Areas subject to these processes during an earthquake have not been identified or mapped statewide, despite the fact that scientific techniques are available to do so. 

(c) It is necessary to identify and map seismic hazard zones in order for cities and counties to adequately prepare the safety element of their general plans and to encourage land use management policies and regulations to reduce and mitigate those hazards to protect public health and safety.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 550, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2692.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide for a statewide seismic hazard mapping and technical advisory program to assist cities and counties in fulfilling their responsibilities for protecting the public health and safety from the effects of strong ground shaking, liquefaction, landslides, or other ground failure and other seismic hazards caused by earthquakes.

(b) It is further the intent of the Legislature that maps and accompanying information provided pursuant to this chapter be made available to local governments for planning and development purposes.

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the California Geological Survey, in
 implementing this chapter, shall, to the extent possible, coordinate its activities with, and use existing information generated from, the earthquake fault zones mapping program pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621), and the inundation maps prepared pursuant to Section 6161 of the Water Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 26, Sec. 76.   (SB 92)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2692.1.

The State Geologist may include in maps compiled pursuant to this chapter information on the potential effects of tsunami and seiche when information becomes available from other sources and the State Geologist determines the information is appropriate for use by local government. The State Geologist shall not be required to provide this information unless additional funding is provided both to make the determination and to distribute the tsunami and seiche information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 550, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

2693.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “City” and “county” includes the City and County of San Francisco. 

(b) “Geotechnical report” means a report prepared by a certified engineering geologist or a civil engineer practicing within the area of his or her competence, which identifies seismic hazards and recommends mitigation measures to reduce the risk of seismic hazard to acceptable levels. 

(c) “Mitigation” means those measures that are consistent with established practice and that will reduce seismic risk to acceptable levels. 

(d) “Project” has the same meaning as in Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621), except as follows: 

(1) A single-family dwelling otherwise qualifying as a project may be exempted by the city or county having jurisdiction of the project. 

(2) “Project” does not include alterations or additions to any structure within a seismic hazard zone which do not exceed either 50 percent of the value of the structure or 50 percent of the existing floor area of the structure.

(e) “Commission” means the Seismic Safety Commission. 

(f) “Board” means the State Mining and Geology Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 550, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

2694.

(a) A person who is acting as an agent for a transferor of real property that is located within a seismic hazard zone, as designated under this chapter, or the transferor, if the person is acting without an agent, shall disclose to any prospective transferee the fact that the property is located within a seismic hazard zone.

(b) Disclosure is required pursuant to this section only when one of the following conditions is met:

(1) The transferor, or transferor’s
 agent, has actual knowledge that the property is within a seismic hazard zone.

(2) A map that includes the property has been provided to the city or county pursuant to Section 2696, and a notice has been posted at the offices of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency that identifies the location of the map and any information regarding changes to the map received by the county.

(c) In all transactions that are subject to Section 1103 of the Civil Code, the disclosure required by subdivision (a) of this section shall be provided by either of the following means:

(1) The Local Option Real Estate
 Transfer Disclosure Statement as provided in Section 1102.6a of the Civil Code.

(2) The Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement as provided in Section 1103.2 of the Civil Code.

(d) If the map or accompanying information is not of sufficient accuracy or scale that a reasonable person can determine if the subject real property is included in a seismic hazard zone, the agent shall mark “Yes” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement. The agent may mark “No” on the Natural Hazard Disclosure Statement if the person attaches a report prepared pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1103.4 of the Civil Code that verifies the property is not in the hazard zone. Nothing in this subdivision is
 intended to limit or abridge any existing duty of the transferor or the transferor’s agents to exercise reasonable care in making a determination under this subdivision.

(e) For purposes of the disclosures required by this section, the following persons shall not be deemed agents of the transferor:

(1) Persons specified in Section 1103.11 of the Civil Code.

(2) Persons acting under a power of sale regulated by Section 2924 of the Civil Code.

(f) For purposes of this section, Section 1103.13 of the Civil Code applies.

(g) The specification of items for disclosure in this section does not limit or abridge any obligation for disclosure created by any other provision of law or that may exist
 in order to avoid fraud, misrepresentation, or deceit in the transfer transaction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 12.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2695.

(a) The board, in consultation with the survey and the commission, shall develop all of the following:

(1) Guidelines for the preparation of maps of seismic hazard zones in the state.

(2) Priorities for mapping of seismic hazard zones. In
 setting priorities, the board shall take into account the following factors:

(A) The population affected by the seismic hazard in the event of an earthquake.

(B) The probability that the seismic hazard would threaten public health and safety in the event of an earthquake.

(C) The willingness of lead agencies and other public agencies to share the cost of mapping within their jurisdiction.

(D) The availability of existing information.

(3) Policies and criteria regarding the responsibilities of cities, counties, and state agencies pursuant to this chapter. The policies and criteria shall address, but not be limited to, the following:

(A) Criteria for approval of a project within a seismic hazard zone, including mitigation measures.

(B) The contents of the geotechnical report.

(C) Evaluation of the geotechnical report by the lead agency.

(4) Guidelines for evaluating seismic hazards and recommending mitigation measures.

(5) Any necessary procedures, including, but not limited to, processing of waivers pursuant to Section 2697, to facilitate the implementation of this chapter.

(b) (1) In developing the policies and criteria pursuant to subdivision (a), the board shall consult with
 and consider the recommendations of an advisory committee, appointed by the board in consultation with the commission, composed of the following members:

(A) An engineering geologist registered in the state.

(B) A seismologist.

(C) A civil engineer registered in the state.

(D) A structural engineer registered in the state.

(E) A representative of city government, selected from a list
 submitted by the League of California Cities.

(F) A representative of county government, selected from a list submitted by the County Supervisors Association of California.

(G) A representative of regional government, selected from a list submitted by the Council of Governments.

(H) A representative of the insurance industry.

(I) The Insurance Commissioner.

(2) All
 of the members of the advisory committee shall have expertise in the field of seismic hazards or seismic safety.

(c) At least 90 days prior to adopting measures pursuant to this section, the board shall transmit or cause to be transmitted a draft of those measures to affected cities, counties, and state agencies for review and comment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 13.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2696.

(a) The State Geologist shall compile maps identifying seismic hazard zones, consistent with the requirements of Section 2695. The maps shall be compiled in accordance with a time schedule developed by the director and based upon the provisions of Section 2695 and the level of funding available to implement this chapter.

(b) The State Geologist shall, upon completion, submit seismic hazard maps compiled pursuant to subdivision (a) to the board and all affected cities, counties, and state agencies for review and comment. Concerned jurisdictions and agencies shall submit all comments to the board for review and consideration within 90 days. Within 90 days
 after the comment period concludes, the State Geologist shall revise the maps, as appropriate, and shall provide copies of the official maps to each state agency, city, or county, including the county recorder, having jurisdiction over lands containing an area of seismic hazard. The county recorder shall record all information transmitted as part of the public record.

(c) In order to ensure that sellers of real property and their agents are adequately informed, any county that receives an official map pursuant to this section shall post a notice within five days of receipt of the map at the office of the county recorder, county assessor, and county planning agency, identifying the location of the map, any information regarding changes to the map, and the effective date of the notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 236, Sec. 14.   (SB 831)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Note: Ch. 65 (pursuant to Sec. 20) supersedes, and precludes operation of, Stats. 1997, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

2697.

(a) Cities and counties shall require, prior to the approval of a project located in a seismic hazard zone, a geotechnical report defining and delineating any seismic hazard. If the city or county finds that no undue hazard of this kind exists, based on information resulting from studies conducted on sites in the immediate vicinity of the project and of similar soil composition to the project site, the geotechnical report may be waived. After a report has been approved or a waiver granted, subsequent geotechnical reports shall not be required, provided that new geologic datum, or data, warranting further investigation is not recorded. Each city and county shall submit one copy of each approved geotechnical report, including the mitigation measures, if any, that are to be taken, to the State Geologist within 30 days of its approval of the report.

(b) In meeting the requirements of this section, cities and counties shall consider the policies and criteria established pursuant to this chapter. If a project’s approval is not in accordance with the policies and criteria, the city or county shall explain the reasons for the differences in writing to the State Geologist, within 30 days of the project’s approval.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1168, Sec. 3.   Section operative April 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 2599.6 (later renumbered as 2699.6).)
-------------------------------------------

2698.

Nothing in this chapter is intended to prevent cities and counties from establishing policies and criteria which are more strict than those established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1168, Sec. 3.   Section operative April 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 2599.6 (later renumbered as 2699.6).)
-------------------------------------------

2699.

Each city and county, in preparing the safety element to its general plan pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 65302 of the Government Code, and in adopting or revising land use planning and permitting ordinances, shall take into account the information provided in available seismic hazard maps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1168, Sec. 3.   Section operative April 1, 1991, pursuant to Section 2599.6 (later renumbered as 2699.6).)
-------------------------------------------

2699.5.

(a) There is hereby created the Seismic Hazards Identification Fund, as a special fund in the State Treasury.

(b) Upon appropriation by the Legislature, the moneys in the Strong-Motion Instrumentation and Seismic Hazards Mapping Fund shall be allocated to the division for purposes of this chapter and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 2700).

(c) On and after July 1, 2004, the Seismic Hazards Identification Fund shall be known as the Strong-Motion Instrumentation and Seismic Hazards Mapping Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 240, Sec. 5.   Effective August 13, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

2699.6.

This chapter shall become operative on April 1, 1991.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2599.6 by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1091, Sec. 126.   Note: This section, as formerly numbered 2599.6, prescribed a delayed operative date (April 1, 1991) for Chapter 7.8, commencing with Section 2690.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Strong-Motion Instrumentation Program [2700. - 2709.1.]

2700.

There is hereby established in the State of California a strong-motion instrumentation program for the purpose of administering the program and of acquiring strong-motion instruments and installing and maintaining such instruments as needed in representative geologic environments and structures throughout the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1152.)
-------------------------------------------

2701.

The survey shall organize and monitor the program with the advice of the Seismic Safety Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 24.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2702.

The survey shall purchase, install, and maintain instruments in representative structures and geologic environments throughout the state, and shall process the data obtained from those instruments resulting from periodic earthquakes, as deemed necessary and desirable by the Seismic Safety Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 25.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

2703.

The survey shall maintain and service the strong-motion instruments installed, shall collect and interpret all records from the instruments, including records that support earthquake early warning and structural health monitoring, and shall make the records, record interpretations, and technical assistance available to the construction industry.
